Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.7511, is amended to read: 239.7511 GAS TAX SIGN ON PETROLEUM DISPENSER. (a) The director must ensure that signs having 12-point font or greater are affixed on retail petroleum dispensers as follows: (1) for regular or premium gasoline, a sign that reads: "new text begin As of January 1, ....... new text end the price for each gallon of gasoline includes the current state gasoline tax of deleted text begin 28.5deleted text end new text begin .......new text end cents per gallon deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin . The gasoline tax amount is tied to inflation and increases automatically on January 1 each year. Thenew text end federal gasoline tax of 18.4 cents per gallonnew text begin is also included in the price of each gallonnew text end . Revenue from the state fuel tax may be used only for roads and bridges, according to the Minnesota Constitution."; and (2) for diesel fuel, a sign that reads: "new text begin As of January 1, ....... new text end the price for each gallon of diesel fuel includes the current state gasoline tax of deleted text begin 28.5deleted text end new text begin .......new text end cents per gallon deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin . The gasoline tax amount is tied to inflation and increases automatically on January 1 each year. Thenew text end federal gasoline tax of deleted text begin 24.4deleted text end new text begin 18.4new text end cents per gallonnew text begin is also included in the price of each gallonnew text end . Revenue from the state fuel tax may be used only for roads and bridges, according to the Minnesota Constitution." (b) The director must distribute the signs under this section to the owner or operator of retail petroleum dispensers. To the extent possible, the director must coordinate the distribution of signs with other duties the director may have involving retail petroleum dispensers. (c) deleted text begin If the amount of the gasoline tax described in paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), changes,deleted text end new text begin Each yearnew text end the director must distribute revised signs to reflect new text begin the current year and new text end the updated gasoline tax amounts deleted text begin within 12 calendar months of the changedeleted text end new text begin specified under section 296A.07, subdivision 3new text end . (d) The director is prohibited from assessing any penalty, fine, or fee on the owner or operator of a retail petroleum dispenser that has a missing, destroyed, defaced, or otherwise damaged gas tax sign.